src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON ALLEGORIJJA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords ending on -i in NOR/SWE, with long and short compound form. Standardized as-iddja (SWE) and -ijºja (NOR). Previously often assimilated as -ija (or just -ia), but both forms are ungrammatical: Short vowels cannot preceed and follow a single intervocalic consonant. -ija is thus ungrammatical as the short a would be lenghtened to á, like "idja-ijá".
    
   +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:%>   R          ;
                +Area/NO:jºja TÁLLA      ;

                +Area/SE:ddja MUORRAInfl ;
                +Area/SE:ddja MUORRACmp  ;

               +Err/Orth:%>   A_CMP_INFL ; !makes the old "allegoria"
               +Err/Orth:j%>  A_CMP_INFL ; !makes the old allegorija

!!€gakademrm: partijja # Even-syllable test
!!€ akademiddja:                 akademijja+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ akademijja:                  akademijja+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ akademidjas:                 akademijja+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ akademijjas:                 akademijja+N+Sg+Ela


LEXICON TEKSTIJLLA
 +OLang/NOB: TEKSTIJLLA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON TEKSTIJLLA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ijlla with long and short compound-form. . Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
 
 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:il%>      R                    ;
            :ijlla     MUORRAInfl           ;
            :ijlla     MUORRACmp            ;
   +Err/Orth:%>il      A_CMP_INFL           ; !makes old "tekstila".


!!€gt-norm: tekstijlla # Even-syllable test
!!€ tekstijlla:                 tekstijlla+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ tekstijlas:                 tekstijlla+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ASIJLLA
 +OLang/NOB: ASIJLLA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON ASIJLLA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ijlla, from nor and swe words ending on -yl. With long and short compound-form.  Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
          
+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:yl%>      R                    ;
           :ijlla     MUORRAInfl           ;
           :ijlla     MUORRACmp            ;
  +Err/Orth:yjlla     MUORRAInfl           ;
  +Err/Orth:yjlla     MUORRACmp            ;
           
  +Err/Orth:%>yl      A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old "asyla".
           
!!€gt-norm: asijlla # Even-syllable test
!!€ asijlla:                 asijlla+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ asijlas:                 asijlla+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BENSIJNNA !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ijnna with long and short compound-form
 +OLang/NOB: BENSIJNNA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON BENSIJNNA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ijnna with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
 
 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:in%>      R                    ;
            :ijnna     MUORRAInfl           ;
            :ijnna     MUORRACmp            ;           
   +Err/Orth:in        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old bensina


!!€gt-norm: tamburijnna # Even-syllable test
!!€ tamburijnna:                 tamburijnna+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ tamburijnas:                 tamburijnna+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON MASJIJNNA
 +OLang/NOB: MASJIJNNA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON MASJIJNNA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -sjijnna with long and short compound-form: -SKIN
 
 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:skin%>      R                    ;
            :sjijnna     MUORRAInfl           ;
            :sjijnna     MUORRACmp            ;   
   +Err/Orth:skin        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old maskina
   +Err/Orth:skijnna     MUORRAInfl           ;


!!€gt-norm: bivtasmasjijnna # Even-syllable test
!!€ bivtasmasjijnna:                 bivtasmasjijnna+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ bivtasmasjijnas:                 bivtasmasjijnna+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ADJEKTIJVVA
 +OLang/NOB: ADJEKTIJVVA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON ADJEKTIJVVA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ijvva with long and short compound-form

 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:iv%>  R          ;
                      :ijvva MUORRAInfl ;
                      :ijvva MUORRACmp  ;
             +Err/Orth:iv    A_CMP_INFL ; ! makes old adjektiva



!!€gt-norm: datijvva # Even-syllable test
!!€ datijvva:                 datijvva+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ datijvas:                 datijvva+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON PARADIJSSA
 +OLang/NOB: PARADIJSSA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON PARADIJSSA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ijssa with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:s%>       R                    ;
                      :ijssa     MUORRAInfl           ;
                      :ijssa     MUORRACmp            ; 
             +Err/Orth:isa       A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old paradisa
  

!!€gt-norm: servijssa # Even-syllable test
!!€ servijssa:                 servijssa+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ servijsas:                 servijssa+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON TELEFÅVNNÅ
 +OLang/NOB: TELEFÅVNNÅ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON TELEFÅVNNÅ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -åvnnå with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:on%>  R          ;
                      :åvnnå MUORRAInfl ;
                      :åvnnå MUORRACmp  ;

             +Err/Orth:åvnna MUORRAInfl ; !Without vowharmony, used in northern areas
             +Err/Orth:åvnna MUORRACmp  ; !Without vowharmony, used in northern areas
             +Err/Orth:on    A_CMP_INFL ; ! makes old telefona


!!€gt-norm: persåvnnå # Even-syllable test
!!€ persåvnnå:                 persåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ persåvnås:                 persåvnnå+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ
 +OLang/NOB: INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ_CMP_INFL  !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -sjåvnnå with long and short compound-form: -TION IN SWEDISH. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

 +CmpNP/Pref+Area/NO+Cmp/Unass:sjons%> R          ;
 +CmpNP/Pref+Area/SE+Cmp/Unass:tions%> R          ;
                              :sjåvnnå MUORRAInfl ;
                              :sjåvnnå MUORRACmp  ;
                              
                     +Err/Orth:sjåvnna MUORRAInfl ; !Without vowharmony, used in northern areas
                     +Err/Orth:sjåvnna MUORRACmp  ; !Without vowharmony, used in northern areas
             +Err/Orth+Area/NO:sjon    A_CMP_INFL ; ! makes old institusjona
             +Err/Orth+Area/SE:tion    A_CMP_INFL ; ! makes old institutiona



!!€gt-norm: populasjåvnnå # Even-syllable test
!!€ populasjåvnnå:                 populasjåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ populasjåvnås:                 populasjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ela


LEXICON MISJÅVNNÅ
 +OLang/NOB: MISJÅVNNÅ_CMP_INFL ;
