src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
akkusatijvva+N+Area/NO+Sem/Cat:akkusat ADJEKTIJVVA "accusative N" ; ! GG
alkijlla+N+Sem/Dummytag:alk ASIJLLA ;
alternasjåvnnå+N+Sem/Dummytag:alterna INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ ;
antipyrijnna+N+Sem/Food-med:anti#pyr BENSIJNNA ;
asijlla+N+Sem/Dummytag:as ASIJLLA ;
attentijvva+N+Sem/Feat-psych:attent ADJEKTIJVVA ;
automasjåvnnå+N+Sem/Domain:automa INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ ;
avijssa+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Org_Txt:áv PARADIJSSA ; !
biejvveavijssa+N+Sem/Txt:biejvve#av PARADIJSSA ;
bifijlla+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bif TEKSTIJLLA ;
bállemmasjijnna+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Veh:bállem#má MASJIJNNA ;
bállemmasjijnna+N+Sem/Veh:bállem#ma MASJIJNNA ;
cyanijnna+N+Sem/Part:cy^an BENSIJNNA ;
daktijlla+N+Sem/Dummytag:dakt ASIJLLA ;
depresjåvnnå+N+Sem/Perc-emo:de^pre MISJÅVNNÅ ;
desideratijvva+N+Sem/Cat:desiderat ADJEKTIJVVA ;
diakråvnnå+N+Sem/Domain:dia^kr TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
dialijssa+N+Sem/Act:dial PARADIJSSA ;
dipolmolekijlla+N+Sem/Part:dipol#molek ASIJLLA ;
doajmmakonsesjåvnnå+N+Area/NO+Sem/Rule:doajmma#konse MISJÅVNNÅ ; ! GG
dubitatijvva+N+Sem/State:dubitat ADJEKTIJVVA ;
dáhtáfijlla+N+Sem/Plc-abstr:dáhtá#f TEKSTIJLLA ;
dáhtámasjijnna+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Obj-el:dáhtá#má MASJIJNNA ;
dáhtámasjijnna+N+Sem/Obj-el:dáhtá#ma MASJIJNNA ;
dájddárorganisasjåvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:dájddár#organisa INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ ;
ednamvuobddemkommisjåvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rule:ednam#vuobddem#kommi MISJÅVNNÅ ;
ekstensjåvnnå+N+Area/NO+Sem/Act:eksten MISJÅVNNÅ ; ! GG
epikrijssa+N+Sem/Txt:epi^kr PARADIJSSA ;
farijnna+N+Sem/Food:far BENSIJNNA ;
finnmárkkokommisjåvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rule:finnmárkko#kommi MISJÅVNNÅ ; ! Gen or nom?
fissijlla+N+Sem/Obj:fiss TEKSTIJLLA ;
fossijlla+N+Sem/Obj:foss TEKSTIJLLA ;
gobelijnna+N+Sem/Dummytag:gobel BENSIJNNA ;
grammofåvnnå+N+Sem/Obj-el:grammof TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
guhkaájgeperspektijvva+N+Sem/Semcon:guhka#ájge#per^spekt ADJEKTIJVVA ;
guovllokonsesjåvnnå+N+Area/SE+Sem/Rule:guovllo#konce MISJÅVNNÅ ; !
gåjkkådimmasjijnna+N+Sem/Obj-el:gåjkkådim#ma MASJIJNNA ;
heterofijlla+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:heterof TEKSTIJLLA ;
iemeálmmukkonvensjåvnnå+N+Sem/Rule:ieme#álmmuk#konven INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ ; !
interrogatijvva+N+Sem/Cat:interrogat ADJEKTIJVVA ; !
kaffeijnna+N+Sem/Food:kaffe^ BENSIJNNA ;
kalcedåvnnå+N+Sem/Mat:kalced TELEFÅVNNÅ ; ! Kalcedon är ett mineral som består av tät, kryptokristallin kiseldioxid svensk
kavitasjåvnnå+N+Sem/Domain:kavita INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ ;
kinijnna+N+Sem/Food-med:kin BENSIJNNA ;
klusijlla+N+Sem/Cat:klus TEKSTIJLLA ;
klássaavijssa+N+Sem/Txt:klássa#av PARADIJSSA ;
kompresjåvnnå+N+Sem/Dummytag:kom^pre MISJÅVNNÅ ;
kopimasjijnna+N+Sem/Dummytag:kopi#ma MASJIJNNA ;
korrelasjåvnnå+N+Sem/Dummytag:korrela INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ ;
krokodilla+N+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:krokod TEKSTIJLLA ; !krokodil
lagosavijssa+N+Sem/Txt:lagos#av PARADIJSSA ;
legiåvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:legi^ TELEFÅVNNÅ ; !
lokomotijvva+N+Sem/Veh:lokomot ADJEKTIJVVA ; !
makromolekijlla+N+Sem/Dummytag:makro#molek ASIJLLA ;
marijnna+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:mar BENSIJNNA ;
masjijnna+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Obj-el:má MASJIJNNA ; !
melåvnnå+N+Sem/Fruit:mel TELEFÅVNNÅ ; !
misjåvnnå+N+Sem/Act:mi MISJÅVNNÅ ;
mobijlla+N+Sem/Obj-el:mob TEKSTIJLLA ;
molekijlla+N+Sem/Dummytag:molek ASIJLLA ;
nylåvnnå+N+Sem/Mat:nyl TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
næhttaavijssa+N+Sem/Txt:næhtta#av PARADIJSSA ;
oajvveorganisasjåvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:oajvve#organisa INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ ;
patråvnnå+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Obj:pátr TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
pektijnna+N+Sem/Dummytag:pekt BENSIJNNA ;
perspektijvva+N+Sem/Semcon:per^spekt ADJEKTIJVVA ;
polijssa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:pol PARADIJSSA ;
prosjektijlla+N+Area/NO+Sem/Dummytag:prosjekt TEKSTIJLLA ; ! GG
prostitusjåvnnå+N+Sem/Act:pro^stitu INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ ; !
radåvnnå+N+Sem/Dummytag:ra^d TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
regresjåvnnå+N+Sem/Dummytag:re^gre MISJÅVNNÅ ;
rubijnna+N+Sem/Dummytag:rub BENSIJNNA ;
sitråvnnå+N+Area/SE+Sem/Fruit:citr TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
sivilisasjåvnnå+N+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:civilisa INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ ;
skepsijssa+N+Sem/Dummytag:skeps PARADIJSSA ;
sláddjimmasjijnna+N+Sem/Dummytag:sláddjim#ma MASJIJNNA ;
stádaarkijvva+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:stáda#ark ADJEKTIJVVA ;
tekstijlla+N+Sem/Obj-clo:tekst TEKSTIJLLA ;
terpentijnna+N+Sem/Dummytag:terpent BENSIJNNA ;
tjahtasuvrremasjijnna+N+Sem/Obj-el:tjahtasuvrre#ma MASJIJNNA ; ! GG
trombåvnnå+N+Sem/Dummytag:tromb TELEFÅVNNÅ ;
turkijssa+N+Area/NO+Sem/Mat:turk PARADIJSSA ; !Mineral
varresvuodainstitusjåvnnå+v1+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:varresvuoda#in^stitu INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ ; !
vinijlla+N+Sem/Food:vin ASIJLLA ; !feil sem-tag?
vuojŋŋammasjijnna+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Obj-el:vuoiŋŋam#ma MASJIJNNA ;
værbbaabessijvva+N+Sem/Cat:værbba#abess ADJEKTIJVVA ; !
